Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.370

Rule-making file.

(1) Each agency shall maintain an official rule-making file for each rule that it (a) proposes by publication in the state register, or (b) adopts. The file and materials incorporated by reference shall be available for public inspection.

(2) The agency rule-making file shall contain all of the following:

(a) A list of citations to all notices in the state register with respect to the rule or the proceeding upon which the rule is based;

(b) Copies of any portions of the agency's public rule-making docket containing entries relating to the rule or the proceeding on which the rule is based;

(c) All written petitions, requests, submissions, and comments received by the agency and all other written material regarded by the agency as important to adoption of the rule or the proceeding on which the rule is based;

(d) Any official transcript of oral presentations made in the proceeding on which the rule is based or, if not transcribed, any tape recording or stenographic record of them, and any memorandum prepared by a presiding official summarizing the contents of those presentations;

(e) All petitions for exceptions to, amendment of, or repeal or suspension of, the rule;

(f) Citations to data, factual information, studies, or reports on which the agency relies in the adoption of the rule, indicating where such data, factual information, studies, or reports are available for review by the public, but this subsection (2)(f) does not require the agency to include in the rule-making file any data, factual information, studies, or reports gathered pursuant to chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328 that can be identified to a particular business;

(g) The concise explanatory statement required by RCW 34.05.325(6); and

(h) Any other material placed in the file by the agency.

(3) Internal agency documents are exempt from inclusion in the rule-making file under subsection (2) of this section to the extent they constitute preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, and intra-agency memoranda in which opinions are expressed or policies formulated or recommended, except that a specific document is not exempt from inclusion when it is publicly cited by an agency in connection with its decision.

(4) Upon judicial review, the file required by this section constitutes the official agency rule-making file with respect to that rule. Unless otherwise required by another provision of law, the official agency rule-making file need not be the exclusive basis for agency action on that rule.

[ 1998 c 280 s 7; 1996 c 102 s 2; 1995 c 403 s 801; 1994 c 249 s 2; 1988 c 288 s 313.]

NOTES:

Application—1995 c 403 ss 201, 301-305, 401-405, and 801: See note following RCW 34.05.328.

Findings—Short title—Intent—1995 c 403: See note following RCW 34.05.328.

Severability—Application—1994 c 249: See notes following RCW 34.05.310.